Utah statutes.
77-2a-2.   Plea in abeyance agreement -- Negotiation -- Contents -- Terms of agreement -- Waiver of time for sentencing.

(1)  At any time after acceptance of a plea of guilty or no contest but prior to entry of judgment of conviction and imposition of sentence, the court may, upon motion of both the prosecuting attorney and the defendant, hold the plea in abeyance and not enter judgment of conviction against the defendant nor impose sentence upon the defendant within the time periods contained in Rule 22(a), Utah Rules of Criminal Procedure.

(2)  The defendant shall be represented by counsel during negotiations for a plea in abeyance and at the time of acknowledgment and affirmation of any plea in abeyance agreement unless the defendant shall have knowingly and intelligently waived his right to counsel.

(3)  The defendant has the right to be represented by counsel at any court hearing relating to a plea in abeyance agreement.

(4) (a)  Any plea in abeyance agreement entered into between the prosecution and the defendant and approved by the court shall include a full, detailed recitation of the requirements and conditions agreed to by the defendant and the reason for requesting the court to hold the plea in abeyance.

(b)  If the plea is to a felony or any combination of misdemeanors and felonies, the agreement shall be in writing and shall, prior to acceptance by the court, be executed by the prosecuting attorney, the defendant, and the defendant's counsel in the presence of the court.

(5)  A plea shall not be held in abeyance for a period longer than 18 months if the plea was to any class of misdemeanor or longer than three years if the plea was to any degree of felony or to any combination of misdemeanors and felonies.

(6)  A plea in abeyance agreement shall not be approved unless the defendant, before the court, and any written agreement, knowingly and intelligently waives time for sentencing as designated in Rule 22(a), Utah Rules of Criminal Procedure.

